Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-204
Compulsory attendance; necessarily employed children; continuation schools; attendance required.

All children who are fourteen years of age or more and not more than sixteen years of age, who reside in a school district in which a part-time continuation school is maintained by authority of the public school district and who are granted permits to be employed under section 79-203, shall attend a public, private, denominational, or parochial part-time continuation school eight hours of each week during the entire school year.

Laws 1921, c. 53, § 1(c), p. 227;

C.S.1922, § 6508b;

Laws 1927, c. 84, § 1, p. 251;

Laws 1929, c. 92, § 1, p. 348;

C.S.1929, § 79-1902;

Laws 1931, c. 149, § 1, p. 405;

Laws 1941, c. 163, § 1, p. 650;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 79-1902;

R.S.1943, § 79-1906;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 12, p. 694;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-206;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 8.